Utah statutes.
58-1-110.   Legislative review in Title 58, Occupations and Professions.

Legislation proposing the licensing or regulation of an occupation or profession under Title 58, Occupations and Professions, that is not currently subject to licensing or regulation under Title 58, Occupations and Professions:

(1)  may not be enacted by the Legislature unless:

(a)  a proposal to license or regulate the occupation or profession has been reviewed by the Occupational and Professional Licensure Review Committee as described in Title 36, Chapter 23, Occupational and Professional Licensure Review Committee Act; or

(b)  the proposed legislation contains a provision that expressly exempts the legislation from the review requirement of Subsection (1)(a);

(2)  is subject to a reauthorization schedule as described in Title 63I, Chapter 1, Legislative Oversight and Sunset Act; and

(3)  shall include a repeal date in Section 63I-1-258 that is no later than 10 years after the effective date of the legislation.



Enacted by Chapter 323, 2013 General Session

